apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="/hatin__vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l>hatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>têm</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>têyî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tê</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>têne</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>têne</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>têne</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatim</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hat</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatibû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>hatîye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>hatîye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>hatîme</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihatim</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihatî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihat</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>dihate</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihatiye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dihatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="prog"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatime</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatiye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatiye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hate</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hatine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nayêm</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nayeyî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nayê</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nayên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nayên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nayên</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatim</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehat</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatime</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatiye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatiye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nehatine</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>were</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>werin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="hatin"><p><l></l><r>hatin</r></p><par n="/hatin__vblex_iv"/></e>
